Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6082.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13h. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), if an owner of an existing building or structure seeks to convert the building or structure into an accessory dwelling unit, the building or structure must have a foundation that complies with the frost protection requirements in the code. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to a building or structure if the owner of the building or structure includes both of the following with the owner's application for a building permit: (a) An attestation that the building or structure was constructed not less than 10 years before the date the owner submits the application. (b) A statement from a structural engineer that indicates the building or structure does not have any evidence of significant frost heaving that would cause concern for the structural integrity of the building or structure.